hu: Fémöntvény alkalmazása: Fogászati készülékek; Figurák; Rudak; Ékszerek; Gépek; Szobor; Szerszámok; Egyéb
vi: Ứng dụng đúc kim loại: Dụng cụ nha khoa; Tượng nhỏ; Thỏi; Đồ trang sức; Thiết bị máy móc; Điêu khắc; Công cụ; Khác
sv: Applicering av metallgjutning: Tandvårdsapparater; Statyetter; Tackor; Smycken; Maskineri; Skulptur; Verktyg; Annat
nl: Toepassing metalen lijstwerk: Tandheelkundige apparaten; Beeldjes; Gietvorm; Sieraden; Werktuigen; Sculptuur; Gereedschap; Andere
zh-TW: 金屬造模應用: 牙科用具; 小雕像; 錠; 珠寶; 機械; 雕塑; 工具; 其他
th: การใช้งานคิ้วโลหะ: อุปกรณ์ทันตกรรม; หุ่นตัวเล็ก; โลหะก้อน; เครื่องเพชรพลอย; เครื่องจักรกล; ประติมากรรม; เครื่องมือ; อื่นๆ
cs: Aplikace tvarování kovů: Zubní pomůcky; Figurky; Ingoty; Klenoty; Strojní zařízení; Sochy; Nářadí a nástroje; Jiné
fi: Metallin muovaussovellus: Hammaslääketieteen laitteet; Koristehahmot; Harkot; Korut; Koneisto; Veistos; Työkalut; Muu
pt-BR: Aplicação da moldagem de metal: Aparelhos odontológicos; Figurinos; Lingotes; Joias; Maquinário; Escultura; Ferramentas; Outro
tr: Metal pervaz uygulaması: Diş aletleri; Heykelcikler; Külçeler; Mücevherler; Makineler; Heykel; Aletler; Diğer
da: Metalstøbningsanvendelse: Tandlægeapparat; Statuetter; Ingots; Smykker; Maskineri; Skulptur; Redskaber; Andet
zh-CN: 金属成型应用: 牙科器械; 手办; 锭; 珠宝首饰; 机械; 雕塑; 工具; 其他
es: Aplicación de moldura de metal: Aparatos dentales; Figuras; Lingotes; Joyería; Maquinaria; Escultura; Herramientas; Otros
el: Εφαρμογή χύτευσης μετάλλων: Οδοντιατρικές συσκευές; Ειδώλια; Ράβδοι; Κοσμήματα; Μηχανήματα; Γλυπτική; Εργαλεία; Άλλο
sk-SK: Použitie kovových výliskov: Zubné prístroje; Figúrky; Ingoty; Šperky; Strojové vybavenie; Sochárstvo; Nástroje; Iné
pl: Zastosowanie do formowania metali: Urządzenia dentystyczne; Figurki; Wlewki; Biżuteria; Maszyneria; Rzeźba; Narzędzia; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Primjena oblikovanja metala: Zubni aparati; Figurice; Ingoti; Nakit; Radni strojevi; Skulptura; Alati; Ostalo
ko: 금속 몰딩 적용: 치과용 기기; 작은 조각상; 잉곳; 주얼리; 기계; 조각; 도구; 기타
it: Applicazione della modanatura di metallo: Applicazioni odontoiatriche; Figurine; Lingotti; Gioielleria; Macchinario; Scultura; Utensili; Altro
bg-BG: Приложение за формоване на метал: Зъболекарски уреди; Фигурки; Слитъци; Бижута; Машини; Скулптура; Инструменти; Други
ja: 金属成形の用途: 歯科用器具; 人形; インゴット; ジュエリー; 機械類; 彫刻; 工具; その他
pt-PT: Aplicação de moldagem de metal: Aparelhos odontológicos; Estatuetas; Lingotes; Joalharia; Maquinaria; Escultura; Ferramentas; Outro
fr: Application de moulage de métal: Appareils dentaires; Figurines; Lingots; Bijoux; Machinerie; Sculpture; Outils; Autre
ru: Назначение формы для литья металла: Стоматологические приборы; Статуэтки; Слитки; Ювелирные изделия; Машины; Скульптура; Инструменты; Другое
de: Anwendung der Metallform: Zahnärztliche Geräte; Figuren; Barren; Schmuck; Maschinen; Skulptur; Werkzeuge; Sonstiges
nb: Bruk av metallstøping: Tannlegeapparater; Figurer; Barrer; Smykker; Maskineri; Skulptur; Verktøy; Annen
en: Metal molding application: Dental appliances; Figurines; Ingots; Jewelry; Machinery; Sculpture; Tools; Other
lt-LT: Metalo liejimo formų paskirtis: Odontologinės priemonės; Figūrėlės; Luitai; Juvelyriniai dirbiniai; Technika; Skulptūra; Įrankiai; Kita
ro-RO: Mod de utilizare matriță de turnare a metalelor: Aparate dentare; Figurine; Lingouri; Bijuterii; Utilaje; Sculptură; Unelte; Altele
sl-SI: Uporaba za oblikovanje kovin: Zobozdravstveni aparati; Figurice; Ingoti; Nakit; Stroji; Kiparstvo; Orodja; Drugo